Washington, session 2025-2026, HB1722.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 1. The legislature finds that school districts across the state have spent significant resources to develop and offer skill center programs and career and technical education programs for high school students. Many of these programs are designed to allow students to begin working in the field during or upon completion of the program; however, some state agencies have enacted rules that place age restrictions on when a student can start a program, test for a license or certification, or work in a profession for which they have been issued a certification or license. These restrictions are not required by federal law, are inconsistent with many other states, and are barriers to 16 and 17 year old students being able to continue with more advanced coursework or otherwise work in a profession after completing training and certification or licensure.Therefore, the legislature intends to direct specified state agencies to revise rules or policies that have been identified as barriers to 16 and 17 year old students being able to continue with more advanced coursework or otherwise work in a profession after completing training and certification or licensure.NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 2. A new section is added to chapter 18.73 RCW to read as follows:The department shall develop a process for authorizing a student who is 16 years of age to begin an emergency medical services training course administered by a state-approved skill center or other bona fide vocational educational program approved by the office of the superintendent of public instruction, provided that the program requires continuous training until the student graduates from high school or turns 18 years of age, whichever is earlier.NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 3. A new section is added to chapter 43.43 RCW to read as follows:(1) The director of fire protection shall assess its policies affecting students who are participating in fire services training offered at: A community and technical college, including through the running start program established in RCW 28A.600.300; a preparatory secondary career and technical education program under chapter 28A.700 RCW, including a program administered by a skill center under chapter 28A.245 RCW; and other relevant educational programs. The policies, including age restrictions for fire services training, examinations, and certification, must be assessed for the purposes of increasing professional and volunteer opportunities in the fire service.(2) The director of fire protection shall report to the legislature by October 1, 2025, on any changes made to its policies and practices and any recommendations on changes to state laws and rules for purposes of improving professional and volunteer opportunities in the fire service.NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 4. A new section is added to chapter 49.12 RCW to read as follows:The department may not prohibit a minor from participating in an occupation based on the risk of exposure to bodily fluids or transmission of infectious agents if the minor has a valid professional license or certification issued by the department of health under Title 18 RCW and said license or certification requires competency in relevant procedures for preventing transmission of bloodborne pathogens and infectious diseases.--- END ---